Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.095

Office of archaeology and historic preservation—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, this chapter does not apply in the department of archaeology and historic preservation to the director, the director's personal secretary, the deputy director, all division directors and assistant directors, and one confidential secretary for each of these officers.

[ 2005 c 333 s 9.]